resources/dictionaries/en-GB/en-GB.aff
FLAG num
AM st:thesaurus ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:thesauri
AM st:thesis ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:theses
AM ts:0 al:thought
AM st:think ts:Vd
AM st:throw ts:Vd
AM st:thrombus ts:Ns
AM st:thrombosis ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:thromboses
AM ts:0 al:thrombi
AM ts:0 al:threw
AM st:thunderstrike ts:Vd
AM ts:0 al:tying
AM st:titmouse ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:titmice
AM st:tell ts:Vd
AM st:take ts:Vd
AM ts:0 al:teeth al:teeth's
AM st:tear ts:Vd
AM ts:0 al:townsmen al:townsmen's
AM st:townsman ts:Ns's
AM st:townsman ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:townswomen
AM st:townswoman ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:tradesmen al:tradesmen's
AM st:tradesman ts:Ns's
AM st:tradesman ts:Ns
AM st:tradesperson ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:tradeswomen
AM st:tradeswoman ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:trainmen al:trainmen's
AM st:trainman ts:Ns's
AM st:trainman ts:Ns
AM st:trapezium ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:trapezia
AM ts:0 al:trod al:trodden
AM ts:0 al:trenchermen al:trenchermen's
AM st:trencherman ts:Ns's
AM st:trencherman ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:tribesmen al:tribesmen's
AM st:tribesman ts:Ns's
AM st:tribesman ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:tribeswomen
AM st:tribeswoman ts:Ns
AM st:trichinosis ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:trichinoses
AM st:trivium ts:Ns
AM st:tread ts:Vd
AM ts:0 st:trie
AM st:tuberculosis ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:tuberculoses
AM ts:0 al:ta
AM st:tie ts:Vd
AM st:umbilicus ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:umbilici
AM ts:0 al:unbound
AM st:unbear ts:Vd
AM st:unbind ts:Vd
AM st:unclothe ts:Vd
AM ts:0 al:unclad
AM st:underfeed ts:Vd
AM ts:0 al:underwent
AM st:underlie ts:Vd
AM ts:0 st:underlie
AM ts:0 al:underlain al:underlay al:underlying
AM ts:0 al:undersold
AM ts:0 al:undershot
AM st:undershoot ts:Vd
AM st:undersell ts:Vd
AM ts:0 al:understood
AM st:understand ts:Vd
AM ts:0 al:undertook
AM st:undertake ts:Vd
AM st:undergo ts:Vd
AM ts:0 al:underwrote
AM st:underwrite ts:Vd
AM ts:0 al:unfroze al:unfrozen
AM st:unfreeze ts:Vd
AM st:unmake ts:Vd
AM ts:0 al:unmade
AM st:unsling ts:Vd
AM st:unsell ts:Vd
AM st:unspeak ts:Vd
AM st:unstring ts:Vd
AM st:unstick ts:Vd
AM st:unteach ts:Vd
AM ts:0 al:untying
AM st:untread ts:Vd
AM st:untie ts:Vd
AM ts:0 al:unwound
AM st:unwind ts:Vd
AM st:unweave ts:Vd
AM st:uphold ts:Vd
AM ts:0 al:upheld
AM st:upshoot ts:Vd
AM st:urinalysis ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:urinalyses
AM ts:0 al:i's
AM st:uterus ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:uteri
AM st:vacuum ts:Ns's
AM st:vacuum ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:vacua al:vacua's
AM st:valis ts:Ns
AM st:venturis ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:vertices
AM st:vertex ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:vestrymen al:vestrymen's
AM st:vestryman ts:Ns's
AM st:vestryman ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:vying
AM st:villus ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:villi
AM st:vison ts:Ns's
AM st:vison ts:Ns
AM st:viscus ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:viscera
AM st:vivarium ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:vivaria
AM ts:0 al:vortices
AM st:vortex ts:Ns
AM st:vie ts:Vd
AM st:wadis ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:woke al:woken
AM ts:0 al:warehousemen al:warehousemen's
AM st:warehouseman ts:Ns's
AM st:warehouseman ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:washerwomen al:washerwomen's
AM st:washerwoman ts:Ns's
AM st:washerwoman ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:watchmen al:watchmen's
AM st:watchman ts:Ns's
AM st:watchman ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:watermen al:watermen's
AM st:waterman ts:Ns's
AM st:waterman ts:Ns
AM st:wavey ts:0
AM ts:0 al:wore al:worn
AM ts:0 al:weathermen al:weathermen's
AM st:weatherman ts:Ns's
AM st:weatherman ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:wove al:woven
AM ts:0 al:wept
AM ts:0 al:Welshmen al:Welshmen's
AM st:Welshman ts:Ns's
AM st:Welshman ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:Welshwomen
AM st:Welshwoman ts:Ns
AM st:go ts:Vd
AM st:weep ts:Vd
AM st:whiney ts:0
AM ts:0 al:wives
AM ts:0 al:would al:wouldst
AM ts:0 al:won
AM ts:0 al:wound
AM ts:0 al:wingmen al:wingmen's
AM st:wingman ts:Ns's
AM st:wingman ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:wiremen al:wiremen's
AM st:wireman ts:Ns's
AM st:wireman ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:withdrew
AM st:withdraw ts:Vd
AM st:withhold ts:Vd
AM ts:0 al:withheld
AM ts:0 al:withstood
AM st:withstand ts:Vd
AM st:wife ts:Ns
AM st:wake ts:Vd
AM ts:0 al:women al:women's
AM st:woman ts:Ns's
AM st:woman ts:Ns
AM st:win ts:Vd
AM ts:0 al:woodsmen al:woodsmen's
AM st:woodsman ts:Ns's
AM st:woodsman ts:Ns
AM st:wear ts:Vd
AM ts:0 al:wrought
AM ts:0 al:workmen al:workmen's
AM st:workman ts:Ns's
AM st:workman ts:Ns
AM st:ill ts:0
AM st:will ts:Vd
AM st:wind ts:Vd
AM st:weave ts:Vd
AM ts:0 al:wrung
AM ts:0 al:wrote
AM st:write ts:Vd
AM st:work ts:Vd
AM st:wring ts:Vd
AM ts:0 al:yachtsmen al:yachtsmen's
AM st:yachtsman ts:Ns's
AM st:yachtsman ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:yachtswomen
AM st:yachtswoman ts:Ns
AM ts:0 al:yeomen al:yeomen's
AM st:yeoman ts:Ns's
AM st:yeoman ts:Ns
AM is:Ns
AM is:At
AM is:N's
AM is:Ns's
AM is:Aness's
AM is:Vd
AM is:Vs
AM is:Ar
AM is:Nm's
AM is:Vg
AM is:Aness is:s
AM is:Ay
AM is:Nm
AM is:Aness
AM is:'s

SET UTF-8
WORDCHARS 0123456789'-.’
NOSUGGEST 200

# ordinal numbers
COMPOUNDMIN 1
# only in compounds: 1th, 2th, 3th
ONLYINCOMPOUND 300
# compound rules:
# 1. [0-9]*1[0-9]th (10th, 11th, 12th, 56714th, etc.)
# 2. [0-9]*[02-9](1st|2nd|3rd|[4-9]th) (21st, 22nd, 123rd, 1234th, etc.)
COMPOUNDRULE 2
COMPOUNDRULE (201)*(202)(203)
COMPOUNDRULE (201)*(204)(205)

TRY esiaénrtolcdugmfphbyvkw-'.zqjxSNRTLCGDMFPHBEAUYOIVKWóöâôZQJXÅçèîêàïüäñ
REP 51
REP A Å
REP a à
REP a á
REP a â
REP a ä
REP a å
REP c ç
REP e è
REP e é
REP e ê
REP e ë
REP i í
REP i ï
REP n ñ
REP o ó
REP o ô
REP o ö
REP u û
REP u ü
REP nt n't
REP alot a_lot
REP avengence a_vengeance
REP ninties 1990s
REP teached taught
REP rised rose
REP f ph
REP ph f
REP f gh
REP f ugh
REP gh f
REP ff ugh
REP uf ough
REP uff ough
REP k ch
REP ch k
REP dg j
REP j dg
REP w ugh
REP ness ity
REP leness ility
REP ness ivity
REP eness ity
REP og ogue
REP ck qu
REP ck que
REP eg e.g.
REP ie i.e.
REP t ght
REP ght t
REP ts ce
REP ce ts
SFX 127 N 1
SFX 127 i 0 i 2028
SFX 54 N 1
SFX 54 0 lest . 2029
SFX 128 N 1
SFX 128 i 's i 2030
SFX 52 N 1
SFX 52 0 en . 2028
SFX 74 N 1
SFX 74 0 gest . 2029
SFX 126 N 1
SFX 126 s des's s 2031
SFX 90 N 1
SFX 90 0 ren's . 2031
SFX 35 N 1
SFX 35 y iness's y 2032
SFX 65 N 1
SFX 65 0 ded . 2033
SFX 43 N 1
SFX 43 0 led . 2033
SFX 111 N 1
SFX 111 0 zes . 2034
SFX 70 N 1
SFX 70 e den e 2033
SFX 13 N 1
SFX 13 0 ted . 2033
SFX 67 N 1
SFX 67 f ves f 2028
SFX 75 N 1
SFX 75 e ten e 2033
SFX 140 N 1
SFX 140 0 en's . 2031
SFX 41 N 1
SFX 41 0 med . 2033
SFX 138 N 1
SFX 138 e ier e 2035
SFX 49 N 1
SFX 49 0 n . 2033
SFX 4 N 1
SFX 4 0 es . 2028
SFX 146 N 1
SFX 146 0 im's . 2036
SFX 58 N 1
SFX 58 0 ging . 2037
SFX 63 N 1
SFX 63 0 en . 2033
SFX 114 N 1
SFX 114 0 per . 2035
SFX 60 N 1
SFX 60 0 bing . 2037
SFX 9 N 1
SFX 9 e ing e 2037
SFX 136 N 1
SFX 136 0 ses's . 2031
SFX 56 N 1
SFX 56 0 ping . 2037
SFX 19 N 1
SFX 19 0 nesses . 2038
SFX 105 N 1
SFX 105 0 best . 2029
SFX 37 N 1
SFX 37 y ily y 2039
SFX 32 N 1
SFX 32 0 ally . 2039
SFX 115 N 1
SFX 115 0 pest . 2029
SFX 101 N 1
SFX 101 e ce e 2028
SFX 47 N 1
SFX 47 0 king . 2037
SFX 45 N 1
SFX 45 x ces x 2028
SFX 34 N 1
SFX 34 y inesses y 2038
SFX 28 N 1
SFX 28 y ies y 2034
SFX 89 N 1
SFX 89 0 ims . 2028
SFX 7 N 1
SFX 7 0 s . 2034
SFX 31 N 1
SFX 31 0 s's . 2031
SFX 6 N 1
SFX 6 0 ing . 2037
SFX 78 N 1
SFX 78 0 ren . 2028
SFX 94 N 1
SFX 94 0 test . 2029
SFX 87 N 1
SFX 87 0 ta . 2028
SFX 39 N 1
SFX 39 0 ses . 2034
SFX 11 N 1
SFX 11 0 es . 2034
SFX 139 N 1
SFX 139 o id o 2033
SFX 96 N 1
SFX 96 0 fed . 2033
SFX 88 N 1
SFX 88 0 im . 2040
SFX 61 N 1
SFX 61 0 ned . 2033
SFX 143 N 1
SFX 143 0 ved . 2033
SFX 72 N 1
SFX 72 0 den . 2033
SFX 118 N 1
SFX 118 y ies's y 2031
SFX 119 N 1
SFX 119 y id y 2033
SFX 69 N 1
SFX 69 d t d 2033
SFX 100 N 1
SFX 100 0 allier . 2035
SFX 22 N 1
SFX 22 0 st . 2029
SFX 30 N 1
SFX 30 y iest y 2029
SFX 97 N 1
SFX 97 0 fing . 2037
SFX 76 N 1
SFX 76 0 zes . 2028
SFX 131 N 1
SFX 131 0 r . 2028
SFX 99 N 1
SFX 99 0 rer . 2035
SFX 14 N 1
SFX 14 0 ting . 2037
SFX 137 N 1
SFX 137 0 i . 2028
SFX 107 N 1
SFX 107 l t l 2033
SFX 21 N 1
SFX 21 0 r . 2035
SFX 12 N 1
SFX 12 0 ses . 2028
SFX 18 N 1
SFX 18 0 ness . 2041
SFX 91 N 1
SFX 91 e i e 2028
SFX 10 N 1
SFX 10 0 ly . 2039
SFX 79 N 1
SFX 79 0 e's . 2031
SFX 141 N 1
SFX 141 n 0 n 2028
SFX 57 N 1
SFX 57 0 ged . 2033
SFX 25 N 1
SFX 25 0 est . 2029
SFX 83 N 1
SFX 83 0 t . 2033
SFX 134 N 1
SFX 134 e t e 2033
SFX 104 N 1
SFX 104 0 ber . 2035

AF 4,2 # 3
AF 8,7,9 # 6
AF 7,13,14 # 11
AF 10,18,19,20 # 14
AF 2,3,7 # 16
AF 10,18,20 # 18
AF 24,25,10,18,19,20 # 20
AF 4,2,5,11,6 # 21
AF 24,25,10,18,19,20,3,5,6,7 # 26
AF 10,18,19,20,21,22 # 27
AF 2,3,5,6,7 # 29
AF 2,3,8,7,9 # 32
AF 18,20 # 33
AF 6,27,28 # 34
AF 3,31 # 39
AF 32,3,31 # 40
AF 10,18,19,20,3 # 41
AF 12 # 50
AF 29,30,37,34,35,36 # 67
AF 2,3,32 # 69
AF 2,3,41,42,7 # 78
AF 2,45 # 83
AF 2,3,46,47,7 # 84
AF 2,3,43,44,7 # 86
AF 49,7,9 # 94
AF 32,18,20,3 # 95
AF 38,39,40 # 97
AF 52,2,3 # 101
AF 53,54,10,18,19,20 # 106
AF 2,3,55,56,7 # 110
AF 2,3,57,58,7 # 111
AF 17,29,30,37,34,35,36 # 113
AF 11,4,2 # 114
AF 2,3,61,62,7 # 116
AF 2,3,7,13,14 # 126
AF 2,3,65,66,7 # 131
AF 63,6,7 # 135
AF 3,57,58,7 # 137
AF 2,3,67 # 143
AF 2,3,71,60,7 # 152
AF 2,3,72,66,7 # 153
AF 3,71,60,7 # 158
AF 34,35,36 # 160
AF 21,22,2,3 # 164
AF 26,79,2,3 # 180
AF 3,57,58,7,73,74 # 181
AF 78,2 # 182
AF 3,5,6,7,83 # 203
AF 2,67,68 # 210
AF 11,38,39,40,4,2,12 # 218
AF 88,89,2,3 # 230
AF 78,90,2 # 233
AF 2,3,91 # 239
AF 91 # 247
AF 2,3,96,97,7 # 248
AF 15,16,7,99 # 258
AF 100,32 # 279
AF 24,25 # 280
AF 3,101,8,7 # 295
AF 25,73,3,58,7 # 297
AF 2,3,87,5,7 # 300
AF 21,22,3,8,7,9 # 304
AF 18,21,23,3,31,8,7,9 # 310
AF 104,105,10,18,19,20 # 311
AF 88,2,3 # 322
AF 10,18,19,20,84,94,2,3,7,13,14 # 344
AF 39 # 352
AF 114,115,3,55,56,7 # 357
AF 72,66,7 # 364
AF 118,17,6,27,28 # 376
AF 120,121,10,18,19,20,65,66 # 394
AF 104,3,71,60,7 # 399
AF 7,9,75 # 412
AF 2,85,45 # 415
AF 3,7,70,59,9 # 416
AF 114,115,2,3,55,56,7 # 417
AF 10,18,19,20,84,94,7,13,14 # 421
AF 3,6,7,119 # 432
AF 11,4,2,126 # 441
AF 2,3,7,70,9 # 444
AF 88,2 # 445
AF 131,2 # 449
AF 2,3,5,6,46,47,7 # 451
AF 24,25,10,18,19,20,4,45 # 455
AF 6,7,69 # 461
AF 7,9,134 # 474
AF 24,2,5,6 # 481
AF 8,49,7,9 # 496
AF 5,6,7,107 # 497
AF 137 # 504
AF 138,23,2,3 # 508
AF 10,18,19,21,22,3,8,7,9 # 510
AF 11,6,102,139 # 532
AF 52,140,2 # 538
AF 2,3,61,62,7,83 # 542
AF 4,5,11,6,200 # 547
AF 53,54,10,18,20 # 549
AF 2,3,141 # 562
AF 110,111,112,2,76 # 567
